Illinois, session 104th, SB3570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 22.59 and by adding Section 3.144 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/3.144 new)7    Sec. 3.144. CCR management unit. "CCR management unit" is 8any area of land at any facility with a CCR surface 9impoundment, on which any noncontainerized accumulation of CCR 10is received, is placed, or is otherwise managed, and that is 11not itself a CCR surface impoundment. "CCR management unit" 12does not include CCR used in a manner that meets the definition 13of coal combustion by-product, unless the owner or operator of 14the CCR management unit or the Agency determines that the CCR 15is causing or contributing to a statistically significant 16concentration of one or more constituents above the 17groundwater protection standard established by the Board under 18this Act. 19    (415 ILCS 5/22.59)20    Sec. 22.59. CCR surface impoundments and CCR management 21units.22    (a) The General Assembly finds that:  SB3570- 2 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1        (1) the State of Illinois has a long-standing policy 2    to restore, protect, and enhance the environment, 3    including the purity of the air, land, and waters, 4    including groundwaters, of this State;5        (2) a clean environment is essential to the growth and 6    well-being of this State;7        (3) CCR generated by the electric generating industry 8    has caused groundwater contamination and other forms of 9    pollution at active and inactive plants throughout this 10    State;11        (4) environmental laws should be supplemented to 12    ensure consistent, responsible regulation of all existing 13    CCR surface impoundments and CCR management units, whether 14    active or inactive; and15        (5) meaningful participation of State residents, 16    especially vulnerable populations who may be affected by 17    regulatory actions, is critical to ensure that 18    environmental justice considerations are incorporated in 19    the development of, decision-making related to, and 20    implementation of environmental laws and rulemaking that 21    protects and improves the well-being of communities in 22    this State that bear disproportionate burdens imposed by 23    environmental pollution.24    Therefore, the purpose of this Section is to promote a 25healthful environment, including clean water, air, and land, 26meaningful public involvement, and the responsible disposal,   SB3570- 3 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1and storage, and other management of coal combustion 2residuals, so as to protect public health and to prevent 3pollution of the environment of this State.4    The provisions of this Section shall be liberally 5construed to carry out the purposes of this Section.6    (b) No person shall:7        (1) cause or allow the discharge of any contaminants 8    from a CCR surface impoundment or CCR management unit into 9    the environment so as to cause, directly or indirectly, a 10    violation of this Section or any regulations or standards 11    adopted by the Board under this Section, either alone or 12    in combination with contaminants from other sources;13        (2) construct, install, modify, operate, or close any 14    CCR surface impoundment, or CCR management unit containing 15    1 ton or greater of CCR, without a permit granted by the 16    Agency, or so as to violate any conditions imposed by such 17    permit, any provision of this Section or any regulations 18    or standards adopted by the Board under this Section;19        (3) cause or allow, directly or indirectly, the 20    discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, 21    or placing of any CCR upon the land in a place and manner 22    so as to cause or tend to cause a violation of this Section 23    or any regulations or standards adopted by the Board under 24    this Section; or25        (4) construct, install, modify, or close a CCR surface 26    impoundment or CCR management unit in accordance with a   SB3570- 4 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    permit issued under this Act without certifying to the 2    Agency that all contractors, subcontractors, and 3    installers utilized to construct, install, modify, or 4    close a CCR surface impoundment or CCR management unit are 5    participants in:6            (A) a training program that is approved by and 7        registered with the United States Department of 8        Labor's Employment and Training Administration and 9        that includes instruction in erosion control and 10        environmental remediation; and11            (B) a training program that is approved by and 12        registered with the United States Department of 13        Labor's Employment and Training Administration and 14        that includes instruction in the operation of heavy 15        equipment and excavation.16        Nothing in this paragraph (4) shall be construed to 17    require providers of construction-related professional 18    services to participate in a training program approved by 19    and registered with the United States Department of 20    Labor's Employment and Training Administration.21        In this paragraph (4), "construction-related 22    professional services" includes, but is not limited to, 23    those services within the scope of: (i) the practice of 24    architecture as regulated under the Illinois Architecture 25    Practice Act of 1989; (ii) professional engineering as 26    defined in Section 4 of the Professional Engineering   SB3570- 5 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    Practice Act of 1989; (iii) the practice of a structural 2    engineer as defined in Section 4 of the Structural 3    Engineering Practice Act of 1989; or (iv) land surveying 4    under the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989. 5    (c) (Blank).6    (d) Before commencing closure of a CCR surface 7impoundment, or CCR management unit containing 1 ton or 8greater of CCR, in accordance with Board rules, the owner of a 9CCR surface impoundment or CCR management unit must submit to 10the Agency for approval a closure alternatives analysis that 11analyzes all closure methods being considered and that 12otherwise satisfies all closure requirements adopted by the 13Board under this Act. Complete removal of CCR, as specified by 14the Board's rules, from the CCR surface impoundment or CCR 15management unit must be considered and analyzed. Section 3.405 16does not apply to the Board's rules specifying complete 17removal of CCR. The selected closure method must ensure 18compliance with regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to 19this Section.20    (e) Owners or operators of CCR surface impoundments who 21have submitted a closure plan to the Agency before May 1, 2019, 22and who have completed closure prior to 24 months after July 2330, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-171) shall not 24be required to obtain a construction permit for the surface 25impoundment closure under this Section. 26    (f) Except for the State, its agencies and institutions, a   SB3570- 6 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1unit of local government, or a not-for-profit electric 2cooperative as defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier 3Act, any person who owns or operates a CCR surface 4impoundment, or CCR management unit containing 1 ton or 5greater of CCR, in this State shall post with the Agency a 6performance bond or other security for the purpose of: (i) 7ensuring closure of the CCR surface impoundment or CCR 8management unit and post-closure care in accordance with this 9Act and its rules; and (ii) ensuring remediation of releases 10from the CCR surface impoundment or CCR management unit. The 11only acceptable forms of financial assurance are: a trust 12fund, a surety bond guaranteeing payment, a surety bond 13guaranteeing performance, or an irrevocable letter of credit.14        (1) The cost estimate for the post-closure care of a 15    CCR surface impoundment or CCR management unit shall be 16    calculated using a 30-year post-closure care period or 17    such longer period as may be approved by the Agency under 18    Board or federal rules.19        (2) In the event of performance bond or other security 20    forfeiture, the The Agency is authorized to enter into 21    such contracts and agreements as it may deem necessary to 22    carry out the purposes of this subsection Section. Neither 23    the State, nor the Director, nor any State employee shall 24    be liable for any damages or injuries arising out of or 25    resulting from any action taken under this subsection 26    Section.  SB3570- 7 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1        (3) The Agency shall have the authority to approve or 2    disapprove any performance bond or other security posted 3    under this subsection. Any person whose performance bond 4    or other security is disapproved by the Agency may contest 5    the disapproval as a permit denial appeal pursuant to 6    Section 40.7    (g) The Board shall adopt rules establishing construction 8permit requirements, operating permit requirements, design 9standards, reporting, financial assurance, and closure and 10post-closure care requirements for CCR surface impoundments. 11Not later than 8 months after July 30, 2019 (the effective date 12of Public Act 101-171) the Agency shall propose, and not later 13than one year after receipt of the Agency's proposal the Board 14shall adopt, rules under this Section. The Board shall not be 15deemed in noncompliance with the rulemaking deadline due to 16delays in adopting rules as a result of the Joint Committee on 17Administrative Rules oversight process. The rules must, at a 18minimum:19        (1) be at least as protective and comprehensive as the 20    federal regulations or amendments thereto promulgated by 21    the Administrator of the United States Environmental 22    Protection Agency in Subpart D of 40 CFR 257 governing CCR 23    surface impoundments;24        (2) specify the minimum contents of CCR surface 25    impoundment construction and operating permit 26    applications, including the closure alternatives analysis   SB3570- 8 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    required under subsection (d);2        (3) specify which types of permits include 3    requirements for closure, post-closure, remediation and 4    all other requirements applicable to CCR surface 5    impoundments; 6        (4) specify when permit applications for existing CCR 7    surface impoundments must be submitted, taking into 8    consideration whether the CCR surface impoundment must 9    close under the RCRA;10        (5) specify standards for review and approval by the 11    Agency of CCR surface impoundment permit applications;12        (6) specify meaningful public participation procedures 13    for the issuance of CCR surface impoundment construction 14    and operating permits, including, but not limited to, 15    public notice of the submission of permit applications, an 16    opportunity for the submission of public comments, an 17    opportunity for a public hearing prior to permit issuance, 18    and a summary and response of the comments prepared by the 19    Agency;20        (7) prescribe the type and amount of the performance 21    bonds or other securities required under subsection (f), 22    and the conditions under which the State is entitled to 23    collect moneys from such performance bonds or other 24    securities;25        (8) specify a procedure to identify areas of 26    environmental justice concern in relation to CCR surface   SB3570- 9 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    impoundments;2        (9) specify a method to prioritize CCR surface 3    impoundments required to close under RCRA if not otherwise 4    specified by the United States Environmental Protection 5    Agency, so that the CCR surface impoundments with the 6    highest risk to public health and the environment, and 7    areas of environmental justice concern are given first 8    priority;9        (10) define when complete removal of CCR is achieved 10    and specify the standards for responsible removal of CCR 11    from CCR surface impoundments, including, but not limited 12    to, dust controls and the protection of adjacent surface 13    water and groundwater; and14        (11) describe the process and standards for 15    identifying a specific alternative source of groundwater 16    pollution when the owner or operator of the CCR surface 17    impoundment believes that groundwater contamination on the 18    site is not from the CCR surface impoundment.19    (h) Any owner of a CCR surface impoundment or CCR 20management unit that generates CCR and sells or otherwise 21provides coal combustion byproducts pursuant to Section 3.135 22shall, every 12 months, post on its publicly available website 23a report specifying the volume or weight of CCR, in cubic yards 24or tons, that it sold or provided during the past 12 months.25    (i) The owner of a CCR surface impoundment or CCR 26management unit shall post all closure plans, permit   SB3570- 10 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1applications, and supporting documentation, as well as any 2Agency approval of the plans or applications, on its publicly 3available website.4    (j) The owner or operator of a CCR surface impoundment 5shall pay the following fees:6        (1) An initial fee to the Agency within 6 months after 7    July 30, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-171) 8    of:9            $50,000 for each closed CCR surface impoundment; 10        and11            $75,000 for each CCR surface impoundment that have 12        not completed closure.13        (2) Annual fees to the Agency, beginning on July 1, 14    2020, of:15            $25,000 for each CCR surface impoundment that has 16        not completed closure; and17            $15,000 for each CCR surface impoundment that has 18        completed closure, but has not completed post-closure 19        care.20    (k) All fees collected by the Agency under subsections 21subsection (j) and (p) shall be deposited into the 22Environmental Protection Permit and Inspection Fund.23    (l) The Coal Combustion Residual Surface Impoundment 24Financial Assurance Fund is created as a special fund in the 25State treasury. Any moneys forfeited to the State of Illinois 26from any performance bond or other security required under   SB3570- 11 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1this Section shall be placed in the Coal Combustion Residual 2Surface Impoundment Financial Assurance Fund and shall, upon 3approval by the Governor and the Director, be used by the 4Agency for the purposes for which such performance bond or 5other security was issued. The Coal Combustion Residual 6Surface Impoundment Financial Assurance Fund is not subject to 7the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 5 of the State 8Finance Act.9    (m) The provisions of this Section shall apply, without 10limitation, to all existing CCR surface impoundments and any 11CCR surface impoundments constructed after July 30, 2019 (the 12effective date of Public Act 101-171), and to all existing CCR 13management units and any CCR management units constructed 14after the effective date of this Public Act of the 104th 15General Assembly, except to the extent prohibited by the 16Illinois or United States Constitutions.17    (n) The following facility evaluation reporting 18requirements apply to CCR management units.19        (1) No later than February 8, 2027, the owner or 20    operator of a CCR surface impoundment must submit to the 21    Agency a copy of the Facility Evaluation Report Part 1 22    required under 40 CFR 257.75(c).23        (2) No later than February 8, 2027, the owner or 24    operator of a CCR surface impoundment must submit to the 25    Agency a copy of the Facility Evaluation Report Part 2 26    required under 40 CFR 257.75(d).  SB3570- 12 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    (o) The Board shall adopt rules establishing permit 2requirements, reporting, financial assurance, and closure and 3post-closure care requirements for CCR management units. Not 4later than one year after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Agency shall 6propose, and not later than 18 months after receipt of the 7Agency's proposal the Board shall adopt, rules under this 8subsection. The Board shall not be deemed in noncompliance 9with the rulemaking deadline due to delays in adopting rules 10as a result of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules 11oversight process. The rules must, at a minimum:12        (1) be at least as protective and comprehensive as the 13    federal regulations or amendments thereto promulgated by 14    the Administrator of the United States Environmental 15    Protection Agency in Subpart D of 40 CFR 257;16        (2) specify the minimum contents of CCR management 17    unit permit applications, including the closure 18    alternatives analysis required under subsection (d);19        (3) specify which types of permits include 20    requirements for closure, post-closure, remediation and 21    all other requirements applicable to CCR management units;22        (4) specify standards for review and approval by the 23    Agency of CCR management unit permit applications;24        (5) specify meaningful public participation procedures 25    for the issuance of CCR management unit permits, 26    including, but not limited to, public notice of the   SB3570- 13 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1    submission of permit applications, an opportunity for the 2    submission of public comments, an opportunity for a public 3    hearing prior to permit issuance, and a summary and 4    response of the comments prepared by the Agency;5        (6) prescribe the type and amount of the performance 6    bonds or other securities required under subsection (f) 7    and the conditions under which the State is entitled to 8    collect moneys from such performance bonds or other 9    securities;10        (7) specify a procedure to identify areas of 11    environmental justice concern in relation to CCR 12    management units;13        (8) define when complete removal of CCR is achieved 14    and specify the standards for responsible removal of CCR 15    from CCR management units, including, but not limited to, 16    dust controls and the protection of adjacent surface water 17    and groundwater; and18        (9) describe the process and standards for identifying 19    a specific alternative source of groundwater pollution 20    when the owner or operator of the CCR management unit 21    believes that groundwater contamination on the site is not 22    from the CCR management unit.23    (p) The owner or operator of a CCR management unit shall 24pay the following fees:25        (1) An initial fee to the Agency, by July 1, 2027, of 26    $75,000 for each CCR management unit.  SB3570- 14 -LRB104 19580 BDA 33028 b1        (2) Annual fees to the Agency, beginning on July 1, 2    2028 of $25,000 for each CCR management unit that has not 3    completed closure; and $15,000 for each CCR management 4    unit that has not completed post-closure care.5    (q) The Agency is authorized to enter into such contracts 6and agreements as it may deem necessary to carry out the 7purposes of this Section. Neither the State, nor the Director, 8nor any State employee shall be liable for any damages or 9injuries arising out of or resulting from any action taken 10under this Section. 11(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-137, eff. 7-23-21; 12102-309, eff. 8-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-662, eff. 139-15-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)